North Carolina, session 2025, SB1066.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Transportation is hereby directed to develop an
alternative funding formula for planning and prioritizing bridge replacement outside of the
Strategic Mobility Formula used in the Strategic Transportation Investments Act (STI). The
proposed alternative formula shall include a prioritization process and revenue source. On or
before December 1, 2026, the Department shall submit the proposed alternative funding formula
and recommendations for legislation, to the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee
on Transportation, Senate Appropriations Committee on the Department of Transportation, Joint
Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee (JLTOC), and the Fiscal Research Division.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department of
Transportation the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be used for the purposes of this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S1066-v-1*